Massachusetts, session 194th, H4355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph, the following new paragraph:-
A licensee who holds a license according to this section, and all employees of said
licensee, shall complete an instructional training program, as approved by the commission, not
less than every three years that includes the following: (i) the statutes and rules that govern the
sale of beer, wine, distilled spirits, cordials or liqueurs for off premises consumption available in
the commonwealth; (ii) prevention of the illegal retail sales of beer, wine, distilled spirits,
cordials or liqueurs to persons under twenty-one years of age or to intoxicated individuals; and
(iii) prevention of second party sales of beer, wine, distilled spirits, cordials or liqueurs that may
reasonably result in persons under twenty-one years of age securing such alcoholic beverages.
of 1